Mississippi, session 2026, SB3108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The City of Pass Christian, Mississippi, is authorized, through its municipal law enforcement, to operate and use one (1) radar speed detection device to enforce the motor vehicle speed limits on those portions of U.S. Highway 90 that are located within the corporate limits of the city. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.